Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-5444
Utilization review agent; compensation; incentive or penalty; restrictions.

A utilization review agent shall not:

(1) Be compensated based on its volume of denials; or

(2) Base any incentive or penalty for a medical reviewer of such agent based on the volume of denials such reviewer issues or upholds.

Laws 2025, LB77, § 13.